Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2230.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3111 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3111. Obedience to traffic-control devices.* * *(e) Liability of GPS navigation provider.--If a commercial driver violates this section using a GPS navigation system that did not provide explicit notice of the prohibitions of an applicable official traffic-control device, in addition to the penalties under subsection (a.1), a GPS navigation provider of the GPS navigation system shall be subject to a civil penalty of $2,000 for each occurrence.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 123456789101112131415161718 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"GPS." The Global Positioning System."GPS navigation provider." A person that offers for sale, subscription or free a GPS navigation system."GPS navigation system." GPS navigation software, satellite navigation software, route planning software, Internet-based route planning or mapping services.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2230PN2923 - 2 - 12345678